Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB123.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 72-17,137 is hereby amended to read as follows:
72-17,137. (a) Each board shall be entitled to receive, from appropriations
from the state general fund, six cents (6¢) $.06 for each type-A meal
served under an approved school lunch program during each school year
commencing with the 1978-79 school year.
(b) Commencing in the 2025-2026 school year:
(1) Each board shall be entitled to receive, from appropriations from
the state general fund, $.40 for each meal served under an approved
reduced price school meals program being provided in accordance with
42 U.S.C. 1759(a); and
(2) no board shall collect $.40 for such reduced price school meals
from students participating in the reduced price school meals program.
(c) For the purpose of this section every type-A lunch served shall be
counted equally. If the total amount of entitlements of all boards in any
school year is more than the amount appropriated for payment thereof,
then the entire amount appropriated therefor shall be prorated among all
boards in proportion to the amount each board is entitled to receive under
this act.
(b)(d) Moneys received by a board from appropriations from the state
general fund under the provisions of this section shall not be used for the
purchase of identifiable imported meats. As used in this subsection,
"identifiable imported meats" shall mean means meats which are labeled
as being imported.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 72-17,137 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.